New York, session 2025-2026, S1239.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "food safety and chemical disclosure act". 3 § 2. The section heading of section 199-a of the agriculture and 4 markets law, as amended by chapter 797 of the laws of 1961, is amended 5 and a new subdivision 5 is added to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01051-16-6 S. 1239--F 2 1 Prohibition as to adulterated or misbranded food and certain food 2 additives and food color additives used or intended for human consump- 3 tion. 4 5. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on 5 or after the date one year after the effective date of this paragraph it 6 shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to 7 manufacture, compound, brew, distill, produce, process, sell, deliver, 8 distribute, hold, offer or expose for sale any of the following 9 substances as food additives or food color additives or any food or food 10 product containing any of the following substances used or intended for 11 human consumption: 12 (i) FD&C Red No. 3; 13 (ii) Potassium bromate; or 14 (iii) Propylparaben. 15 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 16 sion, a retail food store as defined in subdivision two of section five 17 hundred-a of this chapter, a food service establishment as defined in 18 subdivision one of section five hundred-a of this chapter, a food relief 19 organization as defined in subdivision one of section four hundred 20 fifty-one of this chapter, a supermarket, a grocery store, a specialty 21 food store, a farmer's market, or any other vendor that, in the regular 22 course of business, sells food at retail directly to the public on prem- 23 ises located in the state shall be permitted to sell, deliver, distrib- 24 ute, hold, offer or expose for sale any food or food product containing 25 any of the substances listed in paragraph (a) of this subdivision until 26 the expiration date, "best by" date, or "sell by" date printed on the 27 packaging of the food or food product by the manufacturer or producer, 28 but no later than three years after the effective date of this para- 29 graph, provided that such food or food product was acquired for sale 30 within the state by such retail food store, food service establishment, 31 food relief organization, supermarket, grocery store, specialty food 32 store, farmer's market, or other vendor before the effective date of 33 this paragraph. 34 (c) No less than one hundred eighty days before the effective date of 35 paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall amend 36 the exemption list maintained pursuant to subdivision three of this 37 section to indicate that in this state the substances prohibited in this 38 subdivision shall not be deemed to be safe for human consumption on or 39 after the three hundred sixty-fifth day after the effective date of this 40 subdivision, and to further indicate that the provisions of paragraph 41 (b) of this subdivision shall apply until three years after the effec- 42 tive date of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision. 43 § 3. Section 198 of the agriculture and markets law is amended by 44 adding a new subdivision 7-a to read as follows: 45 7-a. The term "generally recognized as safe substance" or "GRAS 46 substance" means any substance added to food that is exempted from the 47 definition of "food additive" under subdivision seven of this section 48 because it is generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientif- 49 ic training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been 50 adequately shown to be safe under the conditions of its intended use: 51 (a) either through scientific procedures using the same quantity and 52 quality of scientific evidence as is required to obtain approval of the 53 substance as a food additive; or 54 (b) for a substance used in food prior to January first, nineteen 55 hundred fifty-eight, through experience based on common use in food. S. 1239--F 3 1 § 4. Subdivision 4 of section 199-a of the agriculture and markets 2 law, as amended by chapter 671 of the laws of 1966, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 4. All data submitted to the commissioner in support of the food or 5 color additives report under this section shall be considered confiden- 6 tial by the commissioner and shall not be revealed to any person other 7 than to a person authorized by the commissioner in the performance of 8 [his] their official duties under this article. In case of an actual 9 controversy as to the validity of an order or decision of the commis- 10 sioner respecting the test data or report in which a proceeding to 11 review has been instituted as authorized by section two hundred two-c of 12 this article the petition, data and report shall be transmitted by the 13 commissioner to the clerk of the court in which the review proceeding is 14 instituted, together with a record of the proceedings on which the 15 commissioner based [his] the order or decision, and such transmittal 16 shall not be construed to be a violation of confidence. Subdivisions 17 two and three of this section shall not apply to food additives or color 18 additives which are safe within the meaning of the federal food, drug 19 and cosmetic act as amended. 20 § 5. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 21 section 199-h to read as follows: 22 § 199-h. Reporting of GRAS substances. 1. a. Except as provided in 23 subdivision two or subdivision three of this section, unless a report 24 described in paragraph b of this subdivision has been submitted to the 25 commissioner and such report is made available in the database described 26 in subdivision five of section one hundred ninety-nine-b of this arti- 27 cle, and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, it 28 shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to: 29 (i) sell or offer or expose for sale for use in or on food, or to use 30 in the manufacturing, compounding, brewing, distilling, producing, or 31 processing of any food or food product, any GRAS substance or combina- 32 tion of GRAS substances; 33 (ii) make any new use of any GRAS substance or combination of GRAS 34 substances in or on food; or 35 (iii) sell or offer or expose for sale any food or food product 36 containing any GRAS substance or combination of GRAS substances. 37 b. The report required pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision 38 shall include but not be limited to the following information: 39 (i) Signed statements and a certification, including: 40 (1) the date and signature of a responsible official of the reporter 41 or reporting organization; 42 (2) the name and address of the reporter or reporting organization; 43 (3) the name of any GRAS substances discussed in the report, using an 44 appropriately descriptive term; 45 (4) intended conditions for the use of any GRAS substance discussed in 46 the report, including the foods in which the substance will be used, the 47 levels of such use in such foods, and the purposes for which the 48 substance will be used, including, when appropriate, a description of 49 any subpopulation expected to consume such GRAS substance or substances; 50 (5) the statutory basis for the conclusion of GRAS status; 51 (6) a statement that the reported substance is not subject to the 52 premarket approval requirements of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic 53 act based on the conclusion that the notified substance is GRAS under 54 the conditions of its intended use; 55 (7) a statement that, if asked to see the data and information that 56 are the basis for the GRAS conclusion, the reporter will agree to: S. 1239--F 4 1 (A) make the data and information available to the commissioner; and 2 (B) upon the commissioner's request, both of the following procedures 3 for making the data and information available to the commissioner: 4 (I) allow the commissioner to review and copy the data and information 5 during customary business hours at the address specified for where these 6 data and information will be available; and 7 (II) provide a complete copy of the data and information either in an 8 electronic format or on paper; 9 (8) views as to whether any of the data and information in the GRAS 10 report are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information law; 11 (9) certifications that, to the best of the reporter's knowledge, the 12 GRAS report is a complete, representative, and balanced submission that 13 includes both unfavorable and favorable information known to the repor- 14 ter and pertinent to the evaluation of the safety and GRAS status of the 15 use of the substance; and 16 (10) the name and position or title of the person who signs the GRAS 17 report. 18 (ii) The identity, method of manufacture, specifications, and physical 19 or technical effect of the notified substance, including: 20 (1) scientific data and information that identifies the GRAS 21 substance, including: 22 (A) examples of appropriate data and information including the chemi- 23 cal name, applicable registry numbers (such as a chemical abstracts 24 service (CAS) registry number or an enzyme commission (EC) number), 25 empirical formula, structural formula, quantitative composition, and 26 characteristic properties; and 27 (B) when the source of a notified substance is a biological material, 28 data and information sufficient to identify: 29 (I) the taxonomic source (e.g., genus, species) of the GRAS substance, 30 including, as applicable, data and information at the sub-species level 31 (e.g., variety, strain); 32 (II) the part of any plant or animal used as the source of the GRAS 33 substance; and 34 (III) any known toxicants that could be in the source of the GRAS 35 substance; 36 (2) a description of the method of manufacture of the GRAS substance 37 in sufficient detail to evaluate the safety of the notified substance as 38 manufactured; 39 (3) specifications for food-grade material; and 40 (4) when necessary to demonstrate safety, relevant data and informa- 41 tion bearing on the physical or other technical effect the GRAS 42 substance is intended to produce, including the quantity of the GRAS 43 substance required to produce such effect. 44 (iii) Dietary exposure to the notified substance, including informa- 45 tion about dietary exposure (i.e., the amount of relevant substances 46 that consumers are likely to eat or drink as part of a total diet), 47 including: 48 (1) an estimate of dietary exposure to the notified substance that 49 includes exposure from its intended use and all sources in the diet; 50 (2) when applicable, an estimate of dietary exposure to any other 51 substance that is expected to be formed in or on food because of the use 52 of the notified substance (e.g., hydrolytic products or reaction 53 products); 54 (3) when applicable, an estimate of dietary exposure to any other 55 substance that is present with the notified substance either naturally 56 or due to its manufacture (e.g., contaminants or by-products); S. 1239--F 5 1 (4) sources of any food consumption data used to estimate dietary 2 exposure, in accordance with clauses one through three of this subpara- 3 graph; and 4 (5) any assumptions made to estimate dietary exposure, in accordance 5 with clauses one through three of this subparagraph. 6 (iv) Self-limiting levels of use in circumstances where the amount of 7 the notified substance that can be added to human food or animal food is 8 limited because the food containing levels of the notified substance 9 above a particular level would become unpalatable or technologically 10 impractical. 11 (v) If the statutory basis for GRAS status is through experience based 12 on common use in food, evidence of a substantial history of consumption 13 of the notified substance for food use by a significant number of 14 consumers prior to January first, nineteen hundred fifty-eight. 15 (vi) A narrative that provides the basis for the conclusion of GRAS 16 status, including: 17 (1) an explanation for why the data and information in the report 18 provide a basis for that the notified substance is safe under the condi- 19 tions of its intended use. Such explanation shall address the safety of 20 the notified substance, considering all dietary sources and taking into 21 account any chemically or pharmacologically related substances in such 22 diet, and identify what specific data and information discussed in 23 accordance with this clause are generally available and not generally 24 available, by providing citations to the list of data and information 25 required in subparagraph (vii) of this paragraph; 26 (2) an explanation of how the generally available data and information 27 relied on to establish safety in accordance with clause one of this 28 subparagraph provides a basis for the conclusion that the reported 29 substance is generally recognized, among qualified experts, to be safe 30 under the conditions of its intended use; 31 (3) either: 32 (A) data and information that are, or may appear to be, inconsistent 33 with the conclusion of GRAS status; or 34 (B) a statement that the available data and information was reviewed 35 and the reporter is not aware of any data and information that are, or 36 may appear to be, inconsistent with the conclusion of GRAS status; 37 (4) if any data and information in the report is exempt from disclo- 38 sure under the freedom of information law, a statement that identifies 39 such data and information; and 40 (5) for non-public, safety-related data and information considered in 41 reaching a conclusion of GRAS status, an explanation of how there could 42 be a basis for a conclusion of GRAS status if qualified experts do not 43 have access to such data and information. 44 (vii) A list of the generally available data, information, and methods 45 the notifier cites in the GRAS notice, including: 46 (1) a list of all of the data and information required by subparagraph 47 (vi) of this paragraph to provide a basis for determining that the noti- 48 fied substance is safe under the conditions of its intended use, as 49 described in accordance with clause one of subparagraph (vi) of this 50 paragraph; and 51 (2) identification of specific data and information listed in accord- 52 ance with clause one of this subparagraph that are generally available 53 and not generally available. 54 (viii) Any previous GRAS substance notices submitted to the federal 55 food and drug administration on the reported substance and the federal 56 food and drug administration's responses. S. 1239--F 6 1 (ix) All relevant currently available safety information. 2 c. A report that includes the information specified in paragraph b of 3 this subdivision and has been submitted to the commissioner and made 4 available in the database described in subdivision five of section one 5 hundred ninety-nine-b of this article, shall be applicable to subsequent 6 uses of a GRAS substance that is the subject of such report that is to 7 be used under the same conditions of intended use, regardless of who 8 submitted such report. 9 2. The following substances are exempt from the reporting requirements 10 of subdivision one of this section: 11 a. Any GRAS substance for which the federal food and drug adminis- 12 tration has received a GRAS notice and issued a letter stating that the 13 federal food and drug administration has no questions regarding the 14 conclusion that the substance is generally recognized as safe under its 15 intended conditions of use; 16 b. Any substances recognized in federal regulations as prior sanc- 17 tioned or GRAS substances for use in food or food packaging; 18 c. Any food contact substance for which there is an effective premar- 19 ket notification demonstrating safety for its intended use; 20 d. Any substances subject to regulation approving its intended use for 21 food; 22 e. A food ingredient that has been widely consumed in the United 23 States prior to January first, nineteen hundred fifty-eight without 24 known detrimental effects, which is subject only to conventional proc- 25 essing as practiced prior to January first, nineteen hundred fifty- 26 eight, and for which no known safety hazard exists; 27 f. Any substance for which the federal food and drug administration 28 has received a new dietary ingredient notification and issued a letter 29 of acknowledgement without objection that the substance is safe under 30 its notification's intended conditions of use; and 31 g. Any substance determined safe to be added to foods by the commis- 32 sioner through rulemaking. 33 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 34 a retail food store as defined in subdivision two of section five 35 hundred-a of this chapter, a food service establishment as defined in 36 subdivision one of section five hundred-a of this chapter, or a food 37 relief organization as defined in section four hundred fifty-one of this 38 chapter, a supermarket, a grocery store, a specialty food store, a farm- 39 er's market, or any other vendor that, in the regular course of busi- 40 ness, sells food at retail directly to the public on premises located in 41 the state shall be permitted to sell, deliver, distribute, hold, offer 42 or expose for sale any food or food product the sale of which would 43 otherwise be prohibited by the provisions of subdivision one of this 44 section, until the expiration date, "best by" date, or "sell by" date 45 printed on the packaging of the food or food product by the manufacturer 46 or producer, but no later than three years after the effective date of 47 this subdivision. This subdivision shall not affect the applicability of 48 any provision of law other than subdivision one of this section, 49 provided that such food or food product was acquired for sale within the 50 state by such retail food store, food service establishment, food relief 51 organization, supermarket, grocery store, specialty food store, farmer's 52 market, or other vendor before the effective date of this section. 53 4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 54 a retail food store as defined in subdivision two of section five 55 hundred-a of this chapter, a food service establishment as defined in 56 subdivision one of section five hundred-a of this chapter, a food relief S. 1239--F 7 1 organization as defined in subdivision one of section four hundred 2 fifty-one of this chapter, a supermarket, a grocery store, a specialty 3 food store, a farmer's market, or any other vendor that, in the regular 4 course of business, sells food at retail directly to the public on prem- 5 ises located in the state, shall not be found in violation of subpara- 6 graph (iii) of paragraph a of subdivision one of this section for sell- 7 ing or offering or exposing for sale any food or food product containing 8 an unreported GRAS substance or combination of GRAS substances if such 9 retailer, as identified in this subdivision, has a valid written 10 contract or renewal agreement with the manufacturer, producer, distrib- 11 utor, or supplier for the purchase of any food or food product that 12 provides such food or food product sold to such retailer, as identified 13 in this subdivision, is compliant with this section. This subdivision 14 shall not affect the applicability of this act to manufacturers, produc- 15 ers, distributors, or suppliers of GRAS substances, food, or food 16 products. 17 5. This section shall only apply to food or food products used or 18 intended for human consumption. 19 6. A small business, defined as a business that is independently owned 20 and operated, and employs one hundred or fewer persons, shall be exempt 21 from the requirements of this section. 22 7. Data establishing the general recognition of safety shall be based 23 on publicly available information and shall not be based on trade 24 secrets. 25 8. Nothing in this section shall impose any requirement regarding food 26 labelling not otherwise required by law. 27 § 6. Section 199-b of the agriculture and markets law is amended by 28 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 29 5. The commissioner: 30 a. shall make reports submitted pursuant to section one hundred nine- 31 ty-nine-h of this article available to the public in a database on its 32 website. The database shall: 33 (i) be searchable by members of the public; 34 (ii) enable consumers to download and print displayed information; and 35 (iii) accommodate reasonably anticipated and actual public use. 36 b. shall redact from the public report any information that has been 37 designated by the submitter as a trade secret, provided, however, that 38 data establishing the general recognition of safety shall not be redact- 39 ed; 40 c. shall update the database with any new information that the commis- 41 sioner receives relating to the safety of the GRAS substance; 42 d. may refuse to list a GRAS substance if the commissioner determines 43 the report does not contain the information required by section one 44 hundred ninety-nine-h of this article; 45 e. shall provide an interim progress report concerning efforts to 46 develop and implement the database system required by this subdivision, 47 which shall include: 48 (i) a projected completion date; 49 (ii) a description of obstacles to development and implementation of 50 the database system; and 51 (iii) an estimate of the costs to complete the implementation of the 52 database system; and 53 f. may charge a fee to the reporter of a GRAS substance in order to 54 recover the costs incurred in listing such GRAS substance and maintain- 55 ing the database. S. 1239--F 8 1 § 7. The second undesignated paragraph of section 202-c of the agri- 2 culture and markets law, as amended by chapter 671 of the laws of 1966, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 The commissioner may institute such action at law or in equity as may 5 appear necessary to enforce compliance with sections one hundred nine- 6 ty-nine-a, one hundred ninety-nine-h, two hundred and two hundred one of 7 this article, and any rule or order respecting a GRAS substance, food 8 additive, or color additive promulgated pursuant to sections one hundred 9 ninety-nine-b and two hundred fourteen-b of this article and, in addi- 10 tion to any other remedy under this chapter or otherwise, may apply for 11 relief by injunction to protect the public interest without being 12 compelled to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not 13 exist. In an action instituted by the commissioner to enforce compliance 14 with said sections one hundred ninety-nine-a, two hundred and two 15 hundred one the commissioner shall not be required to prove that the 16 food, food additive or color additive mentioned in the complaint is 17 unsafe and the claim or defense of the defendant as to its safety shall 18 be immaterial, provided, however, that the recognition by the federal 19 food and drug administration of a food additive or color additive as 20 safe may be alleged as a proper defense. 21 § 8. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 22 law; provided, however, that paragraph (c) of subdivision 5 of section 23 199-a of the agriculture and markets law as added by section two of this 24 act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, the addition, 25 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 26 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 27 made and completed by the commissioner of agriculture and markets on or 28 before such effective date.